Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.434

Professional learning—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout *RCW 28A.300.600 and 28A.300.602 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Differentiated" means that professional learning experiences are designed to meet the needs of individual educators based on multiple sources of data such as professional growth plans, observations, and student growth data.

(2) "Job-embedded" means a sustained series of activities such as workshops and coaching occurring throughout the year that is delivered within the context of an educator's instructional assignments, including both subject and grade level, to support the educator's acquisition and application of the knowledge and skills.

(3) "Student outcomes" refers to two broad categories of student measures: Academic measures and nonacademic measures. Academic measures refer to student learning, growth, and achievement. Nonacademic measures are indicators such as health, behavioral, or socioemotional factors that support student learning.

(4) "Sustained" means ongoing professional learning supported throughout the school year occurring several times within and across school years.

[ 2016 c 77 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.300.604.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.300.600 and 28A.300.602 were recodified as RCW 28A.415.430 and 28A.415.432, respectively, pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 108.

Findings—Intent—2016 c 77: See note following RCW 28A.415.430.